Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-816.01
Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact; rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to provide for certification of teachers pursuant to the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact.

Laws 2023, LB298, § 6.

Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact, see section 79-1505.